Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2583.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1607-T. Medical assistance payments for medical equipment and supplies.(a) Payment.--To the extent money is appropriated for this purpose, the Department of Human Services shall make a one-time payment to a medical assistance managed care organization for the purpose of increasing payments to participating medical assistance providers for medical equipment and supplies. The Department of Human Services shall make the payment no later than December 31, 2027.(b) Amount.--The amount of a payment under subsection (a) shall be determined by multiplying the amount paid during calendar year 2024 by the medical assistance managed care organization to participating medical assistance providers for medical equipment and supplies by 10%.(c) Managed care organization payment.--No later than 30 days after receiving a payment under subsection (a), a medical assistance managed care organization shall make a payment to each participating medical assistance provider for medical equipment and supplies.(d) Amount of participating medical assistance provider payment.--The amount of a payment under subsection (c) to a participating medical assistance provider shall be determined by multiplying the amount paid during calendar year 2024 by the medical assistance managed care organization to the 20260HB2583PN3472 - 2 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829303132 participating medical assistance provider for medical equipment and supplies by 10%.(e) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Medical assistance provider." A person or entity enrolled by the Department of Human Services as a provider of services in the medical assistance program."Medical equipment and supplies." An item specified by Federal or State law or regulation as compensable under the medical assistance program."Participating medical assistance provider." A medical assistance provider that participates in the provider network of a medical assistance managed care organization.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2583PN3472 - 3 - 123456789101112131415